test/src/gt-desc-yamls/sme-tests_gt-desc.yaml
  Proper - Sieinnus-Návggastat: # HEANDARAT-plc
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Sieinnus-Návggastat
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Sieinnus-Návggastaga
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Sieinnus-Návggastahkii
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Sieinnus-Návggastagas, Sieinnus-Návggastagan]
    
  Proper - Stuorrageavŋŋis: # GEAVNNIS-plc
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Stuorrageavŋŋis
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Stuorrageavgŋá
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Stuorrageavgŋái
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Stuorrageavgŋás, Stuorrageavgŋán]

  Proper - Šleađut: # VARGGAT-plc
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Šleađut
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Šleađuid
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Šleađuide
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Šleađuin
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: šleađutlažžii
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: šleađutlaččaid

  Proper - Doaresdievát: # ALEUHTAT-plc
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Doaresdievát
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Doaresdieváid
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Doaresdieváide
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Doaresdieváin
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: doaresdievátlažžii
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: doaresdievátlaččaid

  Proper - Doggeráhppát: # SULLOT-plc
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Doggeráhppát
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Doggeráhppáid
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Doggeráhppáide
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Doggeráhppáin
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: doggeráhppálažžii
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: doggeráhppálaččaid

  Proper - Dálvasnjaŋgguhat: # SULLOT-plc
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Dálvasnjaŋgguhat
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiid
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiidda
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiin
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžii
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: dálvasnjaŋggutlaččaid

  Proper - Njárgalássát: # LASSAT-plc
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Njárgalássát
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Njárgalássáid
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Njárgalássáide
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Njárgalássáin
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: njárgalássálažžii
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: njárgalássálaččaid

  Proper - Njárgalássát: # ADJAGAT-plc
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Skoahppaádjagat
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Skoahppaádjagiid
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Skoahppaádjagiidda
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Skoahppaádjagiin
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: skoahppaájalažžii
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: skoahppaájalaččaid

  Pron - mun: # MUNLEX
    mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: munnje
    mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess: munin
    mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: munno
    mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Loc: munnos
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: midjiide
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: [minguin, miiguin]

  Pron - duokkár: # DAKKAR
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Attr: duokkár
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc: duokkáris
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: duokkárat
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: duokkáriiguin

  Pron - ieš: # IESLEX
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom: ieža
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl2: iežadet
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg3: [alccesis, allasis]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3: [alcceseaskka, allaseaskka]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Loc+PxPl1: alddiineamet
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl3: iežaineaset

  Pron - guhtemuš: # GUHTEMUSLEX
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: [guhtemuš, guđemuš]
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: guđemučča
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ess: guđemužžan
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: guđemuččaide

  Pron - mihkkege: # MIIINTERLEX
    mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: [mihkkege, mihkkige]
    mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: mange
    mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [maidege, maidige, mange]
    mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [mastege, mastige, masge]
    mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: [mahkkege, mahkkige, mahttege, mahttige]

  Pron - eanas: # indef-a-uneven
    eanas+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: eanas
    eanas+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [eatnasis, eatnasin]
    eanas+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: eatnasiid
    eanas+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: eatnasiiguin

  Pron - veaháš: # indef-a-uneven-gahpir
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: veaháš
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [veahážis, veahážin]
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: veahážiid
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: veahážiiguin

  Pron - juobbá: # indef-a-uneven
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juobbá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [juoppás, juoppán]
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juoppáid
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juoppáiguin

  Pron - juogamii: # indef-a-uneven
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juogamii
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juogamas
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juogamaid
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juogamaiguin

  Pron - buotdivnnat: # indefdeclpleven
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: buotdivnnat
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc: buotdivnnain
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: buotdivnnaid
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: buotdivnnaiguin
